Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,122
Clerk; no additional compensation; custodian of seal.

The clerk of the district court in a county having a separate juvenile court shall serve ex officio as clerk of the separate juvenile court. Such clerk shall not receive any additional compensation for performing the duties of such office. He or she shall keep the seal of the court.

Laws 1959, c. 189, § 8, p. 685;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 43-235;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 79.